North Dakota statutes. TITLE 49 Public Utilities
CHAPTER 49-22.1 Energy Conservation and Transmission Facilities
49-22.1-20.
Penalties.

Any person required by this chapter to have a certificate or permit who willfully begins construction of a gas or liquid energy conversion facility or gas or liquid transmission facility without previously securing a certificate or permit as prescribed by this chapter, or who willfully constructs, operates, or maintains a gas or liquid energy conversion facility or gas or liquid transmission facility other than in compliance with the certificate or permit and any terms, conditions, and modifications contained in the certificate or permit is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Any person who willfully violates any regulation issued or approved pursuant to this chapter or who willfully falsifies, tampers with, or renders inaccurate any monitoring device or method required to be maintained under this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Any person who willfully engages in any of the following conduct is subject to a civil penalty of not to exceed ten thousand dollars for each violation for each day the violations persist, except the maximum penalty may not exceed two hundred thousand dollars for any related series of violations:

Begins construction of a gas or liquid energy conversion facility or a gas or liquid transmission facility without having been issued a certificate or permit pursuant to this chapter.

Constructs, operates, or maintains a gas or liquid energy conversion facility or a gas or liquid transmission facility other than in compliance with the certificate or permit and any terms, conditions, or modifications contained therein.

Violates any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted by the commission pursuant to this chapter.

Falsifies, tampers with, or renders inaccurate any monitoring device or method required to be maintained pursuant to a certificate or permit issued pursuant to this chapter.

The civil penalty provided for in subsection 3 may be compromised by the commission. The amount of the penalty when finally determined or agreed upon in compromise must be deposited in the general fund and, if not paid, may be recovered in a civil action in the courts of the state.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the commission may, by injunctive procedures, without bond or other undertaking, proceed against any person that willfully engages in any conduct described in subsection 3. No liability may accrue to the commission or its authorized representative in proceeding against any person pursuant to this section.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 328, § 24, effective July 1, 2017.

49-22.1-21.
Siting process expense recovery — Deposit in special fund — Continuing appropriation.

Every applicant under this chapter shall pay to the commission an application fee:

An applicant for a certificate of site compatibility shall pay an amount equal to five hundred dollars for each one million dollars of investment in the facility.

An applicant for a certificate of corridor compatibility shall pay an amount equal to five thousand dollars for each one million dollars of investment in the facility.

An applicant for a waiver shall pay the amount that would be required for an application for a certificate of site or corridor compatibility for the proposed facility. If a waiver is not granted for a proposed facility, the application fee paid must be allowed as a credit against fees payable under this section in connection with an application under this chapter for a certificate or permit for the proposed facility.

An applicant for a transfer of a certificate or permit shall pay an amount to be determined by the commission to cover anticipated expenses of processing the application.

An applicant requesting an amendment to a certificate or permit, or certifying to the commission under subsection 3 of section 49-22.1-01 or obtaining siting authority under subdivision b of subsection 2 or subdivision c of subsection 4 of section 49-22.1-15, shall pay an amount to be determined by the commission to cover anticipated expenses of processing the application.

The application fee under subdivision a, b, or c may not be less than ten thousand dollars nor more than one hundred thousand dollars.

If an application fee is less than twenty-five thousand dollars, an applicant may agree to pay additional fees that are reasonably necessary for completion of the site, corridor, or route evaluation and designation process.

At the request of the commission and with the approval of the emergency commission, the applicant shall pay any additional fees as are reasonably necessary for completion of the gas or liquid energy conversion facility site, gas or liquid transmission facility corridor, or gas or liquid transmission facility route evaluation and designation process by the commission. The application fee under subsection 1 and any additional fees required of the applicant under this subsection may not exceed an amount equal to one thousand dollars for each one million dollars of investment in a proposed energy conversion facility or ten thousand dollars for each one million dollars of investment in a proposed gas or liquid transmission facility.

A siting process expense recovery fund is established in the state treasury. The commission shall deposit payments received under subsections 1 and 2 in the siting process expense recovery fund. All moneys deposited in the fund are appropriated on a continuing basis to the commission to pay expenses incurred in the siting process. The commission shall specify the time and method of payment of any fees and shall refund the portion of fees collected under subsections 1 and 2 which exceeds the expenses incurred for the evaluation and designation process.

Every applicant under this chapter shall pay to the commission an administrative fee equal to one hundred dollars for each one million dollars of original investment, not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars. The administrative fee must be deposited into the public service commission program fund.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 328, § 24, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 8, § 8, effective May 3, 2021; 2021, ch. 347, § 10, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 49-22.1-21 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 8 of Chapter 8, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1008; and section 10 of Chapter 347, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1096.

49-22.1-22.
Safety.
[Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 328, § 24, effective July 1, 2017; repealed by 2021, ch. 347, § 13, effective August 1, 2021.

49-22.1-23.
Approval for temporary operation or variance.

The commission may approve temporary operation of facilities or a temporary variance from approved construction, operation, or maintenance of facilities upon a showing of good cause and receipt of a utility certification that the activities will have no adverse impacts upon the welfare of the citizens of this state or the environment.

The commission may issue a temporary approval or variance without the necessity of notice, publication, or public hearing with any additional terms, conditions, or modifications deemed necessary to minimize impacts.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 347, § 11, effective August 1, 2021.

49-22.1-24.
Protection of cultural or historic site data.

The commission may limit access to, and release of, information that contains data that specifically identifies the location of cultural, archaeological, historical, or paleontological sites.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 347, § 12, effective August 1, 2021.